Utah statutes.
49-14-104.   Creation of trust fund.

(1)  There is created the "Public Safety Contributory Retirement Trust Fund" for the purpose of paying the benefits and the costs of administering this system.

(2)  The fund shall consist of a number of individual trust accounts created as needed to receive the money and assets transferred into them from the respective terminated systems, all money paid into them, including interest, in accordance with this chapter, whether in the form of cash, securities, or other assets, and of all money received from any other source.

(3)  Custody, management, and investment of the fund shall be governed by Chapter 11, Utah State Retirement Systems Administration.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 250, 2002 General Session

